Utah statutes.
16-10a-705.   Notice of meeting.
(1)  A corporation shall give notice to shareholders of the date, time, and
place of each annual and special shareholders' meeting no fewer than 10 nor
more than 60 days before the meeting date.  Unless this chapter or the
articles of incorporation require otherwise, the corporation is required to
give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.
(2)  Unless this chapter or the articles of incorporation require otherwise,
notice of an annual meeting need not include a description of the purpose or
purposes for which the meeting is called.
(3)  Notice of a special meeting must include a description of the purpose or
purposes for which the meeting is called.
(4) (a)  Subject to Subsection (b), unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an
annual or special shareholders' meeting is adjourned to a different date,
time, or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place if
the new date, time, or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment.
(b)  If the adjournment is for more than 30 days, or if after the adjournment
a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under Section
16-10a-707, notice of the adjourned meeting must be given pursuant to the
requirements of this section to shareholders of record who are entitled to
vote at the meeting.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding a requirement that notice be given under any
provision of this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws of any
corporation, notice shall not be required to be given to any shareholder to
whom:
(i)  a notice of two consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings
or of the taking of action by written consent without a meeting during the
period between the two consecutive annual meetings, have been mailed,
addressed to the shareholder at the shareholder's address as shown on the
records of the corporation, and have been returned undeliverable; or
(ii)  at least two payments, if sent by first class mail, of dividends or
interest on securities during a 12 month period, have been mailed, addressed
to the shareholder at the shareholder's address as shown on the records of the
corporation, and have been returned undeliverable.
(b)  Any action taken or meeting held without notice to a shareholder to whom
notice is excused under Subsection (5) has the same force and effect as if
notice had been duly given.  If a shareholder to whom notice is excused under
Subsection (5) delivers to the corporation a written notice setting forth the
shareholder's current address, or if another address for the shareholder is
otherwise made known to the corporation, the requirement that notice be given
to the shareholder is reinstated. In the event that the action taken by the
corporation requires the filing of a certificate under any provision of this
chapter, the certificate need not state that notice was not given to
shareholders to whom notice was not required pursuant to this subsection.
